Louisiana, session 2026, HB428.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; "2023 and 2025 LSU Fighting Tigers
College World Series Champions"
A.(1) The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall
establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the "2023 and
2025 LSU Fighting Tigers College World Series Champions" plate, provided that
there is a minimum of one thousand applicants for such plate. The plate shall be
restricted to use on passenger cars, pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, motorcycles,
and vans.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 428 ENROLLED
(2) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall create these special prestige license plates when the applicable
statutory provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle and registration
system is updated to accommodate the creation of the new plates.
B. The secretary shall work in conjunction with the Louisiana State
University Board of Supervisors to select the color and design of the plate, provided
it is in compliance with R.S. 47:463(A)(3). The design shall include the words
"2023 and 2025 LSU Fighting Tigers College World Series Champions".
C.(1) The special prestige license plate shall be issued, upon application, to
any citizen of Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate.
(2) Application for a special prestige license plate under this Section
constitutes prior written consent and instruction by the applicant to the department
to provide his name, address, and birth date to Louisiana State University. The
secretary shall ensure that the application for the plate includes a statement granting
such consent.
D. The department shall collect an annual royalty fee of twenty-five dollars
that shall be disbursed in accordance with Subsection E of this Section. This fee
shall be in addition to the standard motor vehicle license tax imposed by Article VII,
Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana and a handling fee of three dollars and
fifty cents for each plate to be retained by the department to offset a portion of
administrative costs.
E.(1) The annual royalty fee shall be collected by the department and
forwarded to Louisiana State University as a charitable donation to the university by
the applicant.
(2) The monies received by Louisiana State University shall be used solely
for academic or financial need-based scholarships.
F. Upon signing of a contract authorizing the use of the logo of Louisiana
State University, the secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall establish the "2023 and 2025 LSU Fighting Tigers College World Series
Champions" license plate in accordance with this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 428 ENROLLED
G. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.